District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-348

Termination of depositories or refusal of contracts; immediate withdrawal.

Repealed.

Oct. 26, 1977, D.C. Law 2-32, § 9, 24 DCR 3725
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Mar. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-56, § 2(a), 44 DCR 6933
1981 Ed., § 47-348.
1973 Ed., § 47-278.
Amendment of Organization Order No. 112, establishing Board of Appeals and view: See Mayor’s Order 84-31, February 9, 1984.